Hawaii, session 2026, HB1485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 712, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§712-     Massage parlors and similar prostitution establishments; property managers and owners; liability.  (a)  If any massage parlor or similar prostitution establishment is searched by law enforcement, pursuant to a warrant or an exception to the warrant clause, and any person is charged with the offense of commercial sexual exploitation under section 712-1200.5, sex trafficking under section 712-1202, or promoting prostitution under section 712-1203 as a result of the search, the property manager and owner of the real property on or in which the massage parlor or similar prostitution establishment is located may be charged with complicity in the offenses charged. (b)  If compelling evidence is presented proving complicity or inaction to address a massage parlor or similar prostitution establishment, both the property manager and owner of the real property on or in which the massage parlor or similar prostitution establishment is located shall be fined $100,000, in addition to any other penalties. (c)  Any worker of the massage parlor or similar prostitution establishment or any person, against whom the offense of commercial sexual exploitation under section 712-1200.5, sex trafficking under section 712-1202, or promoting prostitution under section 712-1203 has been committed, shall be treated as a victim and offered resources to determine the nature of their involvement and the potential for reunification with family if the worker or person is trafficked." SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to enforce this Act, to be allocated as follows: (1)  $ to the city and county of Honolulu; (2)  $ to the county of Hawaii; (3)  $ to the county of Maui; and (4)  $ to the county of Kauai. The sums appropriated shall be expended by each county for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________